Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,248
Terroristic threats; action authorized.

Any individual, partnership, firm, limited liability company, corporation, company, society, or association, the state or any department, agency, or subdivision thereof, or any other public or private entity aggrieved by the actions of an individual convicted of a violation of section 28-311.01 shall have a cause of action for any loss or damage, including reasonable costs and attorney's fees, resulting from the underlying conduct which was the basis for the conviction.

Laws 1995, LB 371, § 30.